Washington statutes.
RCW 36.22.110

Auditor cannot act as attorney or lobbyist.

The person holding the office of county auditor, or deputy, or performing its duties, shall not practice as an attorney or represent any person who is making any claim against the county, or who is seeking to procure any legislative or other action by the board of county commissioners.

[ 2002 c 141 s 1; 1963 c 4 s 36.22.110. Prior: Code 1881 s 2722; 1869 p 312 s 12; 1863 p 550 s 9; 1854 p 425 s 9; RRS s 4100.]